California, session 20252026, AB989.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 19853 of the Government Code is amended to read:19853. (a) All state employees shall be entitled to the following holidays: January 1, the third Monday in January, the third Monday in February, March 31, the last Monday in May, July 4, the first Monday in September, the fourth Friday in September, known as “Native American Day,” November 11, Thanksgiving Day, the day after Thanksgiving, December 25, the day chosen by an employee pursuant to Section 19854, and every day appointed by the Governor of this state for a public fast, thanksgiving, or holiday.(b) If a day listed in this subdivision falls on a Sunday, the following Monday shall be deemed to be the holiday in lieu of the day observed. If November 11 falls upon a Saturday, the preceding Friday shall be deemed to be the holiday in lieu of the day observed.(c) (1) Any state employee who may be required to work on any of the holidays included in this section, and who does work on any of these holidays, shall be entitled to receive straight-time pay and eight hours of holiday credit.(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), an employee who is excluded from the definition of “state employee” in subdivision (c) of Section 3513 and who is required to work on January 1, the last Monday in May, July 4, the first Monday in September, Thanksgiving Day, or December 25 shall be subject to the following:(A) Excluded employees who are eligible for overtime payments under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act shall be paid one and one-half times their salary rate for all hours worked on the holiday and up to eight hours of holiday credit. This pay shall count toward any premium overtime compensation earned during the same workweek. Part-time employees shall receive prorated amounts subject to department rules.(B) Excluded employees who are ineligible for overtime payments under the federal Fair Labor Standards Act shall receive up to eight hours of holiday credit and four hours of informal time off. Part-time employees shall receive prorated amounts of holiday credit and informal time off, subject to department rules.(d) For the purpose of computing the number of hours worked, time when an employee is excused from work because of holidays, sick leave, vacation, annual leave, compensating time off, or any other leave shall not be considered as time worked by the employee for the purpose of computing cash compensation for overtime or compensating time off for overtime.(e) Any state employee, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 3513, may elect to receive eight hours of holiday credit for the date corresponding with the new moon following the winter solstice, or the third new moon following the winter solstice should an intercalary month intervene, known as “Lunar New Year,” April 24, known as “Genocide Remembrance Day,” or June 19, known as “Juneteenth,” or the fourth Friday in September, known as “Native American Day,” in lieu of receiving eight hours of personal holiday credit in accordance with Section 19854.(f) Persons employed on less than a full-time basis shall receive holidays in accordance with the Department of Human Resources rules.(g) If subdivision (a), (c), or (d) is in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding executed or amended pursuant to Section 3517.5 on or after February 1, 2009, or the date that the act adding this section takes effect, whichever is later, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if those provisions of the memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.SEC. 2. Section 19853.1 of the Government Code is amended to read:19853.1. (a) Notwithstanding Section 19853, this section shall apply to state employees in State Bargaining Unit 5.(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), all employees shall be entitled to the following holidays: January 1, the third Monday in January, the third Monday in February, March 31, the last Monday in May, July 4, the first Monday in September, the fourth Friday in September, known as “Native American Day,” November 11, the day after Thanksgiving, December 25, and every day appointed by the Governor of this state for a public fast, thanksgiving, or holiday.If a day listed in this subdivision falls on a Sunday, the following Monday shall be deemed to be the holiday in lieu of the day observed. If November 11 falls upon a Saturday, the preceding Friday shall be deemed to be the holiday in lieu of the day observed. Any employee who may be required to work on any of the holidays included in this section and who does work on any of these holidays shall be entitled to be paid compensation or given compensating time off for that work in accordance with their classification’s assigned workweek group.(c) If the provisions of subdivision (b) are in conflict with the provisions of a memorandum of understanding reached pursuant to Section 3517.5, the memorandum of understanding shall be controlling without further legislative action, except that if the provisions of a memorandum of understanding require the expenditure of funds, the provisions shall not become effective unless approved by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act.(d) Any employee who either is excluded from the definition of state employee in subdivision (c) of Section 3513, or is a nonelected officer or employee of the executive branch of government who is not a member of the civil service, is entitled to the following holidays, with pay, in addition to any official state holiday appointed by the Governor:(1) January 1, the third Monday in January, the third Monday in February, March 31, the last Monday in May, July 4, the first Monday in September, the fourth Friday in September, known as “Native American Day,” November 11, Thanksgiving Day, the day after Thanksgiving, and December 25.(2) When November 11 falls on a Saturday, employees shall be entitled to the preceding Friday as a holiday with pay.(3) When a holiday, other than a personal holiday, falls on a Saturday, an employee shall, regardless of whether the employee works on the holiday, accrue only an additional eight hours of personal holiday credit per fiscal year for the holiday. The holiday credit shall be accrued on the actual date of the holiday and shall be used within the same fiscal year.(4) When a holiday other than a personal holiday falls on Sunday, employees shall be entitled to the following Monday as a holiday with pay.(5) Employees who are required to work on a holiday shall be entitled to pay or compensating time off for this work in accordance with their classification’s assigned workweek group.(6) Persons employed on less than a full-time basis shall receive holidays in accordance with the Department of Human Resources rules.(e) Any employee, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 3513, may elect to use eight hours of vacation, annual leave, or compensating time off consistent with departmental operational needs and collective bargaining agreements for the date corresponding with the second new moon following the winter solstice, or the third new moon following the winter solstice should an intercalary month intervene, known as “Lunar New Year,” April 24, known as “Genocide Remembrance Day,” or June 19, known as “Juneteenth,” and the fourth Friday in September, known as “Native American Day.” “Juneteenth.”(f) This section shall become effective with regard to the March 31 holiday only when the Department of Human Resources notifies the Legislature that the language contained in this section has been agreed to by all exclusive representatives, and the Department of Human Resources authorizes this holiday to be applied to employees designated as excluded from the Ralph C. Dills Act (Chapter 10.3 (commencing with Section 3512), Division 4, Title 1), and the necessary statutes are amended to reflect this change.___________________ REVISIONS: Heading—Line 2.___________________